Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 19 Evidence

9-19-1, 9-19-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 401; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 49; P.L. 1928, ch. 1161, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 939, § 7; G.L. 1956, §§

9-19-1

, 9-19-2; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 5. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-19-3.
Judicial notice of law of other states.

Every court of this state shall take judicial notice of the common law and statutes of every state, territory, and other jurisdiction of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 939, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-3

.

9-19-4.
Information as to foreign law.

The court may inform itself of such laws in such manner as it may deem proper, and the court may call upon counsel to aid it in obtaining the information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 939, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-4

.

9-19-5.
Determination made by court — Review.

The determination of foreign laws shall be made by the court and not by the jury, and shall be reviewable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 939, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 21.

9-19-6.
Evidence of foreign law.

Any party may also present to the trial court any admissible evidence of foreign laws, but, to enable a party to offer evidence of the law in another jurisdiction or to ask that judicial notice be taken thereof, reasonable notice shall be given to the adverse parties either in the pleadings or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 939, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 21.

9-19-7.
Law of foreign countries.

The law of a jurisdiction other than those referred to in §

9-19-3

shall be an issue for the court, but shall not be subject to the foregoing provisions concerning judicial notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 939, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-7

.

9-19-8.
Uniformity of construction.

Sections 9-19-2 —

9-19-7

shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 1939, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-8

.

9-19-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 54; P.L. 1915, ch. 1259, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-9

; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 5. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-19-10.
Entries and memoranda of decedent introduced for successor in title to decedent.

Whenever the entries and written memoranda of a deceased person would be admissible in favor of his or her representatives, such entries and memoranda may be admitted in favor of any person claiming title under or from the decedent.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 55; P.L. 1915, ch. 1259, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-10

.

9-19-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 57; P.L. 1927, ch. 1048, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-11

; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 5. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court took effect. Those Rules take effect October 1, 1987.

9-19-12.
Statements and releases by patients in personal injury cases.

Except as provided below, no settlement or general release or statement in writing signed by any person confined in a hospital or sanitarium as a patient with reference to any personal injuries for which the person is confined in the hospital or sanitarium shall be admissible in evidence, used or referred to in any manner, at the trial of any action to recover damages for personal injuries or consequential damages, so called, resulting therefrom, which statement, settlement, or general release was obtained within fifteen (15) days after injuries were sustained, and the settlement or release shall be null and void unless at least five (5) days prior to the obtaining or procuring of the general release or statement the injured party had signified in writing his or her willingness that the general release or statement be given. This section shall not apply to statements or releases obtained by police officers or inspectors of motor vehicles in the performance of their duty, from members of the family of the person, or by or on behalf of his or her attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3712, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-12

.

9-19-12.1.
Releases for personal injuries.

No person, firm, or corporation whose interest is adverse to that of a person receiving personal injuries as a result of a tortious act shall negotiate any contract, written or oral, or any settlement to release the person, firm, or corporation from liability, within thirty (30) days from the date of the tortious act. Any contract settlement or release obtained in violation of this section shall be voidable at the option of the releasor upon restoration of the consideration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 207, § 1.

9-19-13, 9-19-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 49; P.L. 1928, ch. 1161, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, §§ 1, 15; P.L. 1948, ch. 2087, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

9-19-13

, 9-19-14; P.L. 1961, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 138, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 5. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-19-15.
Stenographic transcripts of testimony in superior court.

Transcripts from stenographic notes of testimony duly taken in the superior court or the family court, under statutory authority, verified by the certificate of the stenographer taking the testimony, and allowed by the court, shall be admissible as evidence that the testimony was given, whenever proof of the testimony is otherwise competent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 394; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-15

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 5.

9-19-16 — 9-19-18.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 398-400; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, §§ 46-48; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, §§ 46-48; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, §§ 7, 13, 14; P.L. 1946, ch. 1770, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2003, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

9-19-16

— 9-19-18; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 5. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-19-19.
Finding of presumed death under federal Missing Persons Act.

A written finding of presumed death, made by the secretary of the army, the secretary of the navy, the secretary of the air force, or other officer or employee of the United States authorized to make such finding, pursuant to the federal Missing Persons Act, 5 U.S.C. § 5561 et seq., as now or hereafter amended, or a duly certified copy of such finding shall be received in any court, office, or other place in this state as prima facie evidence of the death of the person therein found to be dead, and the date, circumstances, and place of his or her disappearance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1709, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-19

.

9-19-20.
Other documents under Missing Persons Act.

An official written report or record, or duly certified copy thereof, that a person is missing, missing in action, interned in a foreign country, or beleaguered, besieged, or captured by a hostile force, or is dead, or is alive, made by any officer or employee of the United States authorized by the act referred to in §

9-19-19

or by any other law of the United States to make the report or record shall be received in any court, office, or other place in this state as prima facie evidence that the person is missing, missing in action, interned in a foreign country, or beleaguered, besieged, or captured by a hostile force, or is dead, or is alive, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1709, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-20

.

9-19-21.
Prima facie validity of federal findings and certified copies.

For the purposes of §§

9-19-19

and

9-19-20

, any finding, report, or record, or duly certified copy thereof, purporting to have been signed by such an officer or employee of the United States as is described in those sections, shall prima facie be deemed to have been signed and issued by such an officer or employee pursuant to law, and the person signing the report or record shall prima facie be deemed to have acted within the scope of his or her authority. If a copy purports to have been certified by a person authorized by law to certify the report or record, the certified copy shall be prima facie evidence of his or her authority so to certify.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1709, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-21

.

9-19-22.
Severability.

If any provision of §§

9-19-19

—

9-19-21

or the application thereof to any person or circumstance be held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application of those sections which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of those sections are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1709, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-22

.

9-19-23, 9-19-24.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 402, 403; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, §§ 50, 51; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, §§ 50, 51; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1956, §§

9-19-23

, 9-19-24; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 32, effective January 10, 1966.

9-19-25.
Illegally seized evidence inadmissible.

In the trial of any action in any court of this state, no evidence shall be admissible where the evidence shall have been procured by, through, or in consequence of any illegal search and seizure as prohibited in § 6 of article 1 of the constitution of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 16; P.L. 1955, ch. 3590, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-25

.

9-19-26.
Testimony in divorce, separation, and annulment proceedings.

In all cases of divorce, separation, and annulment of marriage, the testimony shall be given viva voce in open court; provided, however, that the family court may permit the taking of depositions in cases where the witnesses or parties are aged, infirm, or too ill to appear in court or for any other special cause.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 392; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 10; P.L. 1951, ch. 2738, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-19-26

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

9-19-27.
Evidence of charges for medical and hospital services and for prescriptions and orthopedic appliances — Evidence required from hospital medical records.

This section is enacted primarily to relieve physicians and the other medical professionals defined herein who are associated with hospitals and other health care facilities from the hardship and inconvenience of attending court as witnesses, therefore in interpreting this section and the medical records exception to the hearsay rules of evidence in court or other related proceedings, the trial courts of this state shall liberally construe this section to admit what is presumptively reliable medical evidence presented by way of this statutory process without the necessity of calling numerous medical personnel as witnesses.

In any proceeding commenced in any court, commission, or agency, an itemized bill and reports, whether originating within this state or any other state, including hospital or health care facility, medical records, relating to medical, dental, hospital services, prescriptions, or orthopedic appliances rendered to or prescribed for a person injured, and/or any report of any examination of the injured person, including, but not limited to, hospital medical records and written statements made by the physician or dentist whether contemporaneous with the treatment or not, subscribed and sworn to under the penalties of perjury by the physician, dentist, or authorized agent of the hospital or health care facility rendering the services or by the pharmacist or retailer of orthopedic appliances, shall be admissible as evidence of the fair and reasonable charge for the services and/or the necessity of the services or treatment, the diagnosis of the physician or dentist, the prognosis of the physician or dentist; the opinion of the physician or dentist as to proximate cause of the condition so diagnosed, and the opinion of the physician or dentist as to disability, incapacity or permanency, if any, proximately resulting from the condition so diagnosed. Such affidavit may incorporate by reference such other records or written statements as are relied upon by the affiant in reaching the opinions set forth in the affidavit, if of a type reasonably and customarily relied upon by such providers, and which shall thereby provide the necessary foundation for the record relied upon to be independently introduced as an exhibit in accordance with the terms herein.

The authorized agent of the hospital or health care facility shall be deemed the proper agent to subscribe and swear to said written statements contained in its medical records as the authorized agent for physicians employed by said hospital or clinic, and rendering treatment to the patient during the course of his or her employment. Said records shall not be deemed inadmissible because the physician so employed by the hospital or health care facility has not subscribed to the affidavit.

Provided, further, that written notice of the intention to offer the bill or report as such evidence, together with a copy thereof, has been given to the opposing party or parties, or to his or her or their attorneys, by mailing the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than ten (10) days before the introduction of the bill or report into evidence, and that an affidavit of the notice and the return receipt is filed with the clerk of the court forthwith after the receipt has been returned. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the right of any party to the action to summon or depose, at his or her own expense, the physician, dentist, pharmacist, retailer of orthopedic appliances, or agent of the hospital for the purpose of cross examination with respect to the bill, record, and report or to rebut the contents thereof, or for any other purpose, nor to limit the right of any party to the action to summon or depose any other person to testify in respect to the bill, record, and/or report or for any other purpose.

The adverse party shall be entitled at the expense of the proponent of the affidavit to a reasonable opportunity for cross-examination, not to exceed one hour at the office of the physician or other expert witness. Additional time for cross-examination shall be at the adverse party’s expense. The expert witness fee provided by the proponent of the expert and the additional fee, if required on the part of the adverse party, may be included in the costs of the case payable to the prevailing party. The time and method of the payment or taxing of such costs shall be subject to the order of the trial court.

The words “physician”, and “dentist” shall not include any person who is not licensed to practice as such under the laws of the jurisdiction within which the services were rendered, but shall include chiropodists, chiropractors, optometrists, osteopaths, physical therapists, psychologists, paramedics or rescue or emergency medical service personnel or ambulating services and other medical, mental health care or social work personnel licensed to practice under title 5 or under the laws of the jurisdiction within which the services were rendered; provided, that said chiropodists, chiropractors, optometrists, osteopaths, physical therapists, psychologists, and other medical, mental health care, or social work personnel subscribes to said statements designating his or her licensure, and specifying his or her authority to subscribe in said capacity.

The word “hospital” shall mean any hospital required to incorporate under title 7, or which is in any way licensed or regulated by the laws of any other state, or by the laws and regulations of the United States, including hospitals of the veterans administration or similar type institutions, whether incorporated or not.

The words “health care facility” includes those entities referred to in §

23-17-2(9)

except to the extent that paramedic or rescue or emergency medical service personnel or ambulatory service are excluded.

Any party objecting to the admitting into evidence of the affidavit shall file an objection specifying the grounds thereof within ten (10) days of receipt of the affidavit, or said objections are waived.

Consistent with federal and state constitutional and statutory guarantees nothing in this section shall be construed so as to limit the right of a defendant in a criminal case to confront and cross examine witnesses.

These provisions shall not apply to claims for personal injury or wrongful death filed against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services, dentist, or dental hygienist based on professional negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 395, § 1.

9-19-27.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 232, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 164, § 2. For current law, see §

9-19-27

.

9-19-27.2.
Evidence of charges required from hospitals for medical records, hospital services and for prescriptions and orthopedic appliances — Applicable to claims against medical providers.

In any proceeding commenced in any court, commission, or agency, an itemized bill and reports, whether originating within this state or any other state, including hospital medical records, relating to medical, dental, hospital services, prescriptions, or orthopedic appliances rendered to or prescribed for a person injured, and/or any report of any examination of the injured person, including, but not limited to, hospital medical records subscribed and sworn to under the penalties of perjury by the physician, dentist, or authorized agent of the hospital rendering the services or by the pharmacist or retailer of orthopedic appliances, shall be admissible as evidence of the fair and reasonable charge for the services and/or the necessity of the services or treatment, the diagnosis of the physician or dentist, the prognosis of the physician or dentist; the opinion of the physician or dentist as to proximate cause of the condition so diagnosed, and the opinion of the physician or dentist as to disability or incapacity, if any, proximately resulting from the condition so diagnosed; and, provided, further, that written notice of the intention to offer the bill or report as such evidence, together with a copy thereof, has been given to the opposing party or parties, or to his or her or their attorneys, by mailing the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than ten (10) days before the introduction of the bill or report into evidence, and that an affidavit of the notice and the return receipt is filed with the clerk of the court forthwith after the receipt has been returned. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the right of any party to the action to summon or depose, at his or her own expense, the physician, dentist, pharmacist, retailer of orthopedic appliances, or agent of the hospital for the purpose of cross examination with respect to the bill, record, and report or to rebut the contents thereof, or for any other purpose, nor to limit the right of any party to the action to summon or depose any other person to testify in respect to the bill, record, and/or report or for any other purpose.

The words “physician”, and “dentist” shall not include any person who is not licensed to practice as such under the laws of the jurisdiction within which the services were rendered, but shall include chiropodists, chiropractors, optometrists, osteopaths, physical therapists, psychologists, and other medical personnel licensed to practice under title 5 or under the laws of the jurisdiction within which the services were rendered.

The word “hospital” shall mean any hospital required to incorporate under title 7, or which is in any way licensed or regulated by the laws of any other state, or by the laws and regulations of the United States, including hospitals of the veterans administration or similar type institutions, whether incorporated or not.

Any party objecting to the admitting into evidence of the affidavit shall file an objection specifying the grounds thereof within ten (10) days of receipt of the affidavit, or said objections are waived.

These provisions shall only apply to claims for personal injury or wrongful death filed against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services, dentist, or dental hygienist based on professional negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 373, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 395, § 2.

9-19-28.
Evidence of damage to property.

In any proceeding commenced in any court, commission, or agency for damage to real or personal property, an itemized statement of what portions of the property were repaired or replaced together with the cost of any parts replaced on the property and the value of any labor extended in the repairing or replacement, or an itemized statement of the estimated cost of repairing the damaged property, including the cost of replacement parts and labor, which has been subscribed and sworn to under the penalties of perjury by the person making the repairs or under whose direction the repairs were made, or by the person giving the estimate, or under whose direction the estimate was prepared, shall be admissible as evidence of the fair and reasonable cost of repairing the damage and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the reasonable cost of the repairs thereof; provided, however, that the statement shall contain no reference to the cause of the damage; and, provided further, that written notice of the intention to offer such a statement as evidence, together with a copy thereof, has been given to the opposing party or parties, or to his or her or their attorneys, by mailing the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than ten (10) days before the introduction of the statement into evidence, and that an affidavit of the notice and the return receipt is filed with the clerk of the court forthwith after the receipt has been returned. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the right of any party to summon, at his or her own expense, the person subscribing to the statement, for the purpose of cross examination with respect to the statement or to rebut the contents thereof or for any other purpose, nor to limit the right of any party to summon, at his or her own expense, any other person to testify in respect to the statement or for any other purpose, nor to limit the right of any party to summon, at his or her own expense, the business records of any person offering any such statement.

The word “person” as used herein shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, or corporation, or any full time employee thereof, engaged in the business of servicing and repairing property, or regularly performing such services incident to its principal business, or any individual licensed by the insurance commissioner as a motor vehicle damage appraiser pursuant to §

27-10.1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 164, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 255, § 1.

9-19-29.
Admissibility of records of deceased physicians, dentists and professional engineers.

In all actions for the recovery of benefits under the Workers’ Compensation Act, chapters 29 — 38 of title 28, for personal injury or death, and in all actions for the recovery of damages for personal injury or death in any civil proceeding, if a physician, dentist, or professional engineer has died prior to the time of the trial of the action, the written records, reports, or bills of the physician or dentist concerning the patient who suffered the injury or death, and the reports and scale drawings of the professional engineer concerning matter relevant to the circumstances under which the injury or death was sustained, shall be admissible in evidence.

In all actions for the recovery of benefits under the Workers’ Compensation Act for personal injury or death and in all actions for the recovery of damages for personal injury or death in any civil proceeding, if a physician, dentist, or professional engineer has moved out of this state prior to trial or cannot be located within this state after a reasonable search, and whose whereabouts and address are unknown, any written records, reports, or bills of the physician or dentist concerning the patient who suffered the injury or death, and the reports and scale drawings of the professional engineer concerning matter relevant to the circumstances under which the injury or death was sustained, shall be admissible in evidence and the patient may testify as to the medical or dental services provided and the treatment received, and another physician or dentist may provide evidence as to the medical or dental services or treatment as if the physician or dentist had been the one who rendered the services or treatment, including evidence as to the fair and reasonable charge for the services, the necessity of the services or treatment and any other matter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 453, § 1.

9-19-30.
Certain statements of fact or opinion admissible in evidence in civil actions for malpractice.

Statements of facts or opinions on a subject of science or art contained in a published treatise, periodical, book, or pamphlet shall, insofar as the court shall find that the statements are relevant and that the writer of the statements is recognized in his or her profession or calling as an expert on the subject, be admissible in civil actions for malpractice, error, or mistake against physicians, surgeons, dentists, optometrists, hospitals, and sanitaria, as evidence tending to prove the facts or as opinion evidence; provided, however, that the party intending to offer as evidence any such statements shall, not less than thirty (30) days before the trial of the action, give the adverse party or his or her attorney notice of such intention, stating the name of the writer of the statements, the title of the treatise, periodical, book, or pamphlet in which they are contained, the date of publication of the treatise, periodical, book, or pamphlet, the name of the publisher of the treatise, periodical, book, or pamphlet, and wherever possible or practicable the page or pages of the treatise, periodical, book, or pamphlet on which the statements appear.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 230, § 1.

9-19-31.
Written statements or recordings in actions to recover damages for personal injuries.

In any action to recover damages for personal injuries, no written statements or recordings concerning the facts out of which the cause of action arose given by either party to the other, or to his or her agent, attorney, or insurer shall be admissible in evidence for any purpose unless the name and address of the person taking the statement or recording appears thereon and unless a copy thereof is retained by the party giving the statement or recording or delivered to him or her at the time the statement or recording was given or within thirty (30) days thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 250, § 1.

9-19-32.
Informed consent a preliminary question.

In actions against physicians as defined in §

5-37-1(12)

, hospitals, clinics, health maintenance organizations, or professional service corporations providing health care services and organized under chapter 5.1 of title 7 for malpractice in providing treatment to patients, issues of informed consent or reasonable disclosure of all known material risks shall be initially considered by the court as preliminary questions of fact. Such issues shall be submitted to the jury by the court only in the event that it finds, after weighing the evidence and considering the credibility of the witnesses, that reasonable minds might fairly come to different conclusions in respect to such issues on the basis of the evidence presented and inferences to be drawn therefrom.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 244, § 7; P.L. 1977, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 149, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 70.

9-19-33.
Res ipsa loquitur in medical malpractice actions.

In actions against licensed physicians, hospitals, clinics, health maintenance organizations, or professional service corporations providing health care services under chapter 5.1 of title 7 for malpractice in providing treatment to patients, the issue of res ipsa loquitur shall be a preliminary question of fact for the court to determine. The issue will be submitted to the jury by the court only in the event that, after weighing the evidence and the credibility of witnesses, the court is of the opinion that reasonable minds might fairly come to different conclusions as to whether the evidence of the circumstances would create a basis for a reasonable inference of negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 244, § 7; P.L. 1977, ch. 77, § 2.

9-19-34.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 244, § 7; P.L. 1977, ch. 77, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 101, effective July 8, 1997. For present comparable provisions, see §

9-19-34.1

.

9-19-34.1.
Collateral source rule in medical malpractice actions.

In the event the defendant so elects, in a legal action based upon a cause of action arising after January 1, 1987, for personal injury against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services under chapter 5.1 of title 7, dentist, or dental hygienist based upon professional negligence, the defendant may introduce evidence of any amount payable as a benefit to the plaintiff as a result of the personal injury pursuant to any state income disability or workers’ compensation act, any health, sickness or income disability insurance, accident insurance that provides health benefits or income disability coverage, and any contract or agreement of any group, organization, partnership, or corporation to provide, pay for, or reimburse the cost of medical, hospital, dental, or other health care services. Where the defendant elects to introduce such evidence, the plaintiff may introduce evidence of any amount which the plaintiff has paid or contributed to secure his or her right to any insurance benefits concerning which the defendant has introduced evidence. When such evidence is introduced, the jury shall be instructed to reduce the award for damages by a sum equal to the difference between the total benefits received and the total amount paid to secure the benefits by the plaintiff or the court may ascertain the sum by special interrogatory and reduce the award for damages after verdict. Whenever an award is so reduced, the lien of any first party payor who has paid such a benefit against the judgment shall be foreclosed and the plaintiff shall have no legal obligation to reimburse the payor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 350, § 7.

9-19-35.
Failure to bill inadmissible in medical malpractice cases.

For the purposes of this section, “health care provider” means any physician as defined in §

5-37-1(12)

, hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or professional service corporation providing health care services and organized under chapter 5.1 of title 7, or any officer, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his employment.

The failure of a health care provider to bill a patient for services rendered shall not be construed as an admission of liability and shall not be admissible in evidence as to liability in any hearing or trial of an action of tort or breach of contract for malpractice, error, or mistake against a health care provider.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 70.

9-19-36.
Advance payments inadmissible in medical malpractice cases.

Any advance payment for medical bills by a health care provider or by the insurer of a health care provider shall not be construed as an admission of liability and shall not be admissible in evidence as to liability in any hearing or trial of an action of tort or breach of contract for malpractice, error, or mistake against a health care provider; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to limit the right of a health care provider to introduce in evidence any advance payment for medical bills in diminution of damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 103, § 1.

9-19-37.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 350, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 5. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-19-38.
Proof of life or work life expectancy.

In any proceeding commenced in any court, commission, or agency, when the life or work life expectancy of a person shall be at issue or when it is necessary to establish the expectancy of continued life or work life expectancy of any person from any period of the person’s life, whether he or she is living at the time or not, the most recent issue of “The United States Abridged Life Tables” (United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics) or Tables of Work Life Expectancies as published in “Work Life Estimates: Effects of Race and Education” (United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics) shall be admissible in evidence as competent evidence of such matter. The admissibility of evidence provided for in this section shall not be deemed to render inadmissible evidence as to the health, constitution, habits, or occupation of the person or any other evidence otherwise admissible under the laws of this state.

The life and work life expectancy tables may be evidenced by an official publication of the tables or by a copy of the tables as published in a compiler’s note under this section in the general laws of Rhode Island. The tables as published in the general laws of Rhode Island shall be sufficient proof of life and work life expectancy without further foundation or authentication; provided, however, that written notice of the intention to offer the life or work life expectancy tables as evidence, together with a copy of the tables, has been given to the opposing party or parties, or to his or her or their attorneys, by mailing it by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than ten (10) days before the introduction of the tables into evidence, and that an affidavit of the notice and the return receipt are filed with the clerk of the court immediately after the receipt has been returned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 511, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 335, § 1.